Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1736
Seller; officers, directors, partners, managers; conviction or judgment; disclosure.

The statements required by subdivision (2) of section 59-1735 shall set forth the court, the date of the conviction or of the judgment and, when involved, the name of the governmental agency that brought the action resulting in the conviction or judgment.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 36.